Idaho, session 2026, S1446.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs for
trustee and benefit payments from the listed funds for the restoration of
assertive community treatment and peer support services for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
I. DIVISION OF MEDICAID - BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
State-Directed Opioid Settlement Fund $4,527,000
Idaho Millennium Income Fund 3,500,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 20,525,000
TOTAL $28,552,000
II. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
State-Directed Opioid Settlement Fund $1,031,000
Idaho Millennium Income Fund 1,119,000
TOTAL $2,150,000
GRAND TOTAL $30,702,000
SECTION 2. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Judicial Branch in the Court Operations
Division for the District Courts Program the following amounts to be ex-
pended according to the designated expense classes from the State-Directed


Opioid Settlement Fund for the restoration of peer support services for men-
tal health courts for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
Operating Expenditures $25,000
TrusteeandBenefitPayments 225,000
TOTAL $250,000
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS FOR BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH PROGRAMS. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the
Department of Health and Welfare is hereby exempted from the provisions of
Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the Ba-
sic Medicaid Plan Program and the Adult Mental Health Program from other pro-
grams within the department for all moneys appropriated to it for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the purpose of funding assertive
community treatment and peer support services.
SECTION 4. OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUND USAGE. The Legislature finds and de-
clares that assertive community treatment and peer support services serve
the overarching purposes of the national opioid settlements even though not
every person assertive community treatment and peer support services serves
suffers from opioid use disorder (OUD). In a time of fiscal exigency, every
dollar matters to ensure assertive community treatment and peer support ser-
vices remain viable. Therefore, in accordance with provisions in the opi-
oid settlement agreements that allow the state to use a limited percentage
of settlement funds for purposes not directly related to OUD, and notwith-
standing the provisions of section 57-825, Idaho Code, or any other provi-
sion of law to the contrary, of the amounts appropriated in Section 1 and
Section 2 of this act from the State-Directed Opioid Settlement Fund, up to
$5,808,000 may be used for assertive community treatment and peer support
services participants who face substance abuse disorders or mental health
conditions (SUD/MH) without co-occurring OUD as those terms are used in Ex-
hibit E, Schedule B of the settlement agreements.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 3 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.